Massachusetts, session 194th, H2223.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Agent” the following 
definition:- 
“Benzodiazepine”, any substance or drug which contains a benzene ring fused to a 7 
member diazepine ring, results in the depression of the central nervous system and is primarily 
intended to treat insomnia, convulsions and anxiety, and used for muscle relaxation and pre-
operation treatment including alprazolam, clonazepam, diazepam, lorazepam, and temazepam. 
SECTION 2. Said section 1 of said chapter 94C, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after the definition of “Narcotic drug” the following definition:- 

of 4 10  “Non-benzodiazepine hypnotic”, any substance or drug which produces effects similar to 
that of a benzodiazepine and is primarily intended to treat insomnia, including zaleplon, 
zopiclone, and zolpidem. 
SECTION 3. The first paragraph of section 21 of said chapter 94C, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- 
In filling a prescription for a benzodiazepine or a non-benzodiazepine hypnotic 
prescription, the pharmacist shall ensure that the label includes a cautionary statement explaining 
the risks associated with long-term use which shall be bolded and contained within a box.  
SECTION 4. Said section 21 of said chapter 94C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
hereby further amended by inserting after the third paragraph the following paragraph:- 
The department of public health shall produce and distribute either in written or 
electronic form to pharmacies, not including institutional pharmacies, pamphlets for consumers 
relative to benzodiazepines and  non-benzodiazepine hypnotics that includes educational 
information about: (i) misuse and abuse by adults and children; (ii) risk of dependency and 
addiction; (iii) proper storage and disposal; (iv) addiction support and treatment resources; and 
(v) the telephone helpline operated by the bureau of substance abuse services established in 
section 18 of chapter 17. A pharmacist shall distribute the pamphlet when dispensing a 
benzodiazepines or a non-benzodiazepine hypnotic. 
SECTION 5. Section 23 of said chapter 94C, as so appearing is hereby amended by 
adding the following subsection:- 

of 4 30  (i) A written prescription for less than a 10 day supply of a benzodiazepine or a non-
benzodiazepine hypnotic shall not be refilled. 
SECTION 6. Chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 12GG, as inserted by section 2 of chapter 454 of the acts of 2016, the following section:- 
Section 12HH. No practitioner shall prescribe a benzodiazepine or a non-benzodiazepine 
hypnotic, as defined in section 1 of chapter 94C, without first obtaining the patient’s written 
informed consent. The commissioner of public health shall prescribe a form for physicians to use 
in obtaining such consent. This form shall be written in a manner designed to permit a person 
unfamiliar with medical terminology to understand its purpose and content, and shall include the 
following information: (i) misuse and abuse by adults and children; (ii) risk of dependency and 
addiction; and (iii) risks associated with long-term use of the drugs.  
Nothing in this section is intended to abolish or limit any common law rights of persons 
other than those whose rights it governs for the purpose of any civil action. 
SECTION 7. Said chapter 94C is hereby amended by inserting after section 19C, as 
inserted by section 92 of chapter 46 of the acts 2015, the following section:- 
Section 19D. the department of public health shall promulgate regulations establishing 
protocols to safely discontinue the use of benzodiazepines and non-benzodiazepine hypnotics 
and minimize the patient's symptoms of withdrawal; provided however, that the department shall 
not mandate that a patient currently prescribed benzodiazepines or non-benzodiazepine hypnotics 
discontinue use.  No practitioner shall discontinue a patient's prescription of a benzodiazepine or 
non-benzodiazepine hypnotics in a manner inconsistent with the regulation established by the 
department of public health, and shall adhere to a patient or symptom guided taper.  

of 4 52  SECTION 8. There is hereby established a special commission to study protocols to 
safely discontinue the use of benzodiazepines and non-benzodiazepine hypnotics and minimize 
the patient’s symptoms of withdrawal.  The commission shall consist of 9 members; 1 member 
of the house of representatives, to be appointed by the speaker of the house; 1 member of the 
senate, to be appointed by the president of the senate; 4 members to be appointed by the 
governor, 1 of whom shall be a psychiatrist licensed to practice in the commonwealth, 1 of 
whom shall be a representative from the bureau of substance abuse services, 1 of whom shall be 
a representative from the Center for Addiction Medicine at Massachusetts General Hospital, and 
1 of whom shall be an advocate from the addiction treatment community; the secretary of health 
and human services, or a designee; the commissioner of public health, or a designee and the 
commissioner of mental health, or a designee. 
The commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the 
clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, including any recommendations for 
legislation or regulations, within 4 months of the effective date of this act.